Virginia statutes. Title 16.1. Courts Not of Record.
Article 7. Transfer and Waiver.

§ 16.1-269.
Repealed by Acts 1994, cc. 859 and 949.

§ 16.1-269.1.
Trial in circuit court; preliminary hearing; direct indictment; remand.

Except as provided in subsections B and C, if a juvenile 14 years of age or older at the time of an alleged offense is charged with an offense which would be a felony if committed by an adult, the court shall, on motion of the attorney for the Commonwealth and prior to a hearing on the merits, hold a transfer hearing and may retain jurisdiction or transfer such juvenile for proper criminal proceedings to the appropriate circuit court having criminal jurisdiction of such offenses if committed by an adult. Any transfer to the appropriate circuit court shall be subject to the following conditions:

Notice as prescribed in §§

16.1-263

and

16.1-264

shall be given to the juvenile and his parent, guardian, legal custodian or other person standing in loco parentis; or attorney;

The juvenile court finds that probable cause exists to believe that the juvenile committed the delinquent act as alleged or a lesser included delinquent act which would be a felony if committed by an adult;

The juvenile is competent to stand trial. The juvenile is presumed to be competent and the burden is on the party alleging the juvenile is not competent to rebut the presumption by a preponderance of the evidence; and

The court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that the juvenile is not a proper person to remain within the jurisdiction of the juvenile court. In determining whether a juvenile is a proper person to remain within the jurisdiction of the juvenile court, the court shall consider, but not be limited to, the following factors:

The juvenile’s age;

The seriousness and number of alleged offenses, including (i) whether the alleged offense was committed in an aggressive, violent, premeditated, or willful manner; (ii) whether the alleged offense was against persons or property, with greater weight being given to offenses against persons, especially if death or bodily injury resulted; (iii) whether the maximum punishment for such an offense is greater than 20 years confinement if committed by an adult; (iv) whether the alleged offense involved the use of a firearm or other dangerous weapon by brandishing, threatening, displaying or otherwise employing such weapon; and (v) the nature of the juvenile’s participation in the alleged offense;

Whether the juvenile can be retained in the juvenile justice system long enough for effective treatment and rehabilitation;

The appropriateness and availability of the services and dispositional alternatives in both the criminal justice and juvenile justice systems for dealing with the juvenile’s problems;

The record and previous history of the juvenile in this or other jurisdictions, including (i) the number and nature of previous contacts with juvenile or circuit courts, (ii) the number and nature of prior periods of probation, (iii) the number and nature of prior commitments to juvenile correctional centers, (iv) the number and nature of previous residential and community-based treatments, (v) whether previous adjudications and commitments were for delinquent acts that involved the infliction of serious bodily injury, and (vi) whether the alleged offense is part of a repetitive pattern of similar adjudicated offenses;

Whether the juvenile has previously absconded from the legal custody of a juvenile correctional entity in this or any other jurisdiction;

The extent, if any, of the juvenile’s degree of intellectual disability or mental illness;

The juvenile’s school record and education;

The juvenile’s mental and emotional maturity; and

The juvenile’s physical condition and physical maturity.No transfer decision shall be precluded or reversed on the grounds that the court failed to consider any of the factors specified in subdivision 4.

The juvenile court shall conduct a preliminary hearing whenever a juvenile 16 years of age or older is charged with murder in violation of §

18.2-31

,

18.2-32

or

18.2-40

, or aggravated malicious wounding in violation of §

18.2-51.2

. If the juvenile is 14 years of age or older, but less than 16 years of age, then the court may proceed, on motion of the attorney for the Commonwealth, as provided in subsection A.

The juvenile court shall conduct a preliminary hearing whenever a juvenile 16 years of age or older is charged with murder in violation of §

18.2-33

; felonious injury by mob in violation of §

18.2-41

; abduction in violation of §

18.2-48

; malicious wounding in violation of §

18.2-51

; malicious wounding of a law-enforcement officer in violation of §

18.2-51

.1; felonious poisoning in violation of §

18.2-54.1

; adulteration of products in violation of §

18.2-54.2

; robbery in violation of subdivision B 1 or 2 of §

18.2-58

or carjacking in violation of §

18.2-58.1

; rape in violation of §

18.2-61

; forcible sodomy in violation of §

18.2-67.1

; object sexual penetration in violation of §

18.2-67.2

; manufacturing, selling, giving, distributing, or possessing with intent to manufacture, sell, give, or distribute a controlled substance or an imitation controlled substance in violation of §

18.2-248

if the juvenile has been previously adjudicated delinquent on two or more occasions of violating §

18.2-248

provided the adjudications occurred after the juvenile was at least 16 years of age; manufacturing, selling, giving, distributing, or possessing with intent to manufacture, sell, give, or distribute methamphetamine in violation of §

18.2-248.03

if the juvenile has been previously adjudicated delinquent on two or more occasions of violating §

18.2-248.03

provided the adjudications occurred after the juvenile was at least 16 years of age; or felonious manufacturing, selling, giving, distributing, or possessing with intent to manufacture, sell, give, or distribute anabolic steroids in violation of §

18.2-248.5

if the juvenile has been previously adjudicated delinquent on two or more occasions of violating §

18.2-248.5

provided the adjudications occurred after the juvenile was at least 16 years of age, provided the attorney for the Commonwealth gives written notice of his intent to proceed pursuant to this subsection. Prior to giving written notice of his intent to proceed pursuant to this subsection, the attorney for the Commonwealth shall submit a written request to the director of the court services unit to complete a report as described in subsection B of §

16.1-269.2

unless waived by the juvenile and his attorney or other legal representative. The report shall be filed with the court and mailed or delivered to (i) the attorney for the Commonwealth and (ii) counsel for the juvenile, or, if the juvenile is not represented by counsel, to the juvenile and a parent, guardian, or other person standing in loco parentis with respect to the juvenile, within 21 days of the date of the written request. After reviewing the report, if the attorney for the Commonwealth still intends to proceed pursuant to this subsection, he shall then provide the written notice of such intent, which shall include affirmation that he reviewed the report. The notice shall be filed with the court and mailed or delivered to counsel for the juvenile or, if the juvenile is not then represented by counsel, to the juvenile and a parent, guardian or other person standing in loco parentis with respect to the juvenile at least seven days prior to the preliminary hearing. If the attorney for the Commonwealth elects not to give such notice, if he elects to withdraw the notice prior to certification of the charge to the grand jury, or if the juvenile is 14 years of age or older, but less than 16 years of age, he may proceed as provided in subsection A.

Upon a finding of probable cause pursuant to a preliminary hearing under subsection B or C, the juvenile court shall certify the charge, and all ancillary charges, to the grand jury. Such certification shall divest the juvenile court of jurisdiction as to the charge and any ancillary charges. Nothing in this subsection shall divest the juvenile court of jurisdiction over any matters unrelated to such charge and ancillary charges which may otherwise be properly within the jurisdiction of the juvenile court.If the court does not find probable cause to believe that the juvenile has committed the violent juvenile felony as charged in the petition or warrant or if the petition or warrant is terminated by dismissal in the juvenile court, the attorney for the Commonwealth may seek a direct indictment in the circuit court. If the petition or warrant is terminated by nolle prosequi in the juvenile court, the attorney for the Commonwealth may seek an indictment only after a preliminary hearing in juvenile court.If the court finds that the juvenile was not (i) for the purposes of subsection A, 14 years of age or older or (ii) for purposes of subsection B or C, 16 years of age or older, at the time of the alleged commission of the offense or that the conditions specified in subdivision A 1, 2, or 3 have not been met, the case shall proceed as otherwise provided for by law.

An indictment in the circuit court cures any error or defect in any proceeding held in the juvenile court except with respect to the juvenile’s age. If an indictment is terminated by nolle prosequi, the Commonwealth may reinstate the proceeding by seeking a subsequent indictment.

History.

1994, cc. 859, 949; 1996, cc. 755, 914; 1997, c. 862; 2012, cc. 476, 507, 772; 2020, cc. 987, 988; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 534.

Cross references.

As to the one year deadline for claims of error or defect, see §

16.1-272.1

.

As to Sex Offender and Crimes Against Minors Registry, see §

9.1-900

et seq.

As to definition and effect of “sealing” criminal history record information, see §

19.2-392.5

.

Editor’s note.

Acts
1993, c. 929, cl. 3, as amended by Acts
1994, c. 564, cl. 1, and Acts
1996, c. 616, cl. 3, provides that the contingent enactment of this section by Acts
1994, cc. 859 and
949, cl. 2, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “only if state funds are provided by the General Assembly sufficient to provide adequate resources for the court to carry out the purposes of this act and to fulfill its mission to serve children and families of the Commonwealth.” The funding was not provided.

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 534, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to
§ 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation is $0 for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities and cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

The 1996 amendments.

The 1996 amendments by cc. 755 and 914 are identical, and, in subsection A, in the first sentence, inserted “Except as provided in subsections B and C” preceding “if a juvenile fourteen years of age” and
inserted “at the time of an alleged offense” preceding “is charged with an offense,” deleted “Except as provided in subsection B” preceding “The court finds” in subdivision A 4, substituted “juvenile correctional centers” for “learning centers” in clause (iii) of subdivision A 4 e, rewrote subsection B, which formerly read: “The court may hold a transfer hearing and certify the juvenile for transfer to the appropriate circuit court without making the finding required by subdivision A 4 if a juvenile fourteen years of age or older is charged with: (B 1.) A Class 1 or 2 felony violation of Chapter 4 (§

18.2-30

et seq.) of Title 18.2 or, if the juvenile is sixteen years of age or older, a Class 3 felony violation of Chapter 4 (§

18.2-30

et seq.) of Title 18.2 for: (i) murder under Article 1; (ii) mob-related felony under Article 2; (iii) kidnapping or abduction under Article 3; or (iv) assault or bodily wounding under Article 4; or, (B 2.) Any unclassified felony violation of Chapter 4 (§ 18.2-30 et seq.) of Title 18.2 which carries a maximum penalty of imprisonment for life or a term of imprisonment of forty years if committed by an adult,” and added subsections C through E.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and substituted “intellectual disability or mental illness” for “mental retardation or mental illness” in subdivision A 4 g; and made minor stylistic changes throughout the section.

The 2012 amendment by c. 772 inserted the language following “§

18.2-67.2

” and preceding “providing the attorney” in subsection C, and made minor stylistic changes throughout.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 987 and 988 are identical, and throughout subsections B and C substituted “16 years” for 14 years”; in subsection B, added the last sentence; in subsection C, in the first sentence; added the second through fourth sentences and in the last sentence, inserted “or if the juvenile is 14 years of age or older, but less than 16 years of age”; and, in subsection D, substituted “(i) for the purposes of subsection A, 14 years of age or older or (ii) for purposes of subsection B or C, 16 years of age or older” for “14 years of age or older.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 534, effective July 1, 2021, inserted “subdivision B 1 or 2 of” in subsection C in the first sentence.

Law Review.

For article, “Legal Issues Involving Children,” see 28 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1075 (1994).

For note, “Novak v. Commonwealth: Are Virginia Courts Providing Special Protection to Virginia’s Juvenile Defendants?”, see 30 U. Rich. L. Rev. 935 (1996).

For an article relating to all published Virginia criminal law decisions between July 1, 1997, and July 1, 1998, see 32 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1091 (1998).

For an article, “Legal Issues Involving Children,” see 32 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1345 (1998).

For a review of Virginia legal issues involving children, see 33 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1001 (1999).

For 2000 survey of Virginia law regarding children, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 939 (2000).

For article, “Legal Issues Involving Children,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 741 (2001).

For article summarizing published Virginia criminal law decisions between July 1, 2002 and July 1, 2003, see 38 U. Rich. L. Rev. 87 (2003).

For annual survey article on legal issues involving children, see 38 U. Rich. L. Rev. 161 (2003).

For survey of Virginia criminal law and procedure for the year 2004-2005, see 40 U. Rich. L. Rev. 197 (2005).

For note, “Let the Jury Do the Waive: How Apprendi v. New Jersey Applies to Juvenile Transfer Proceedings,” see 48 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 723 (2006).

For annual survey, “A Look Back and Forward: Legislative and Regulatory Highlights for 2008 and 2009 and a Discussion of Juvenile Transfer,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 53 (2009).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

9B M.J. Infants & Juveniles, §§ 13, 19, 82, 84; 10A M.J. Insane & Other Incompetent Persons, § 50.

§ 16.1-269.2.
Admissibility of statement; investigation and report; bail.

Statements made by the juvenile at the transfer hearing provided for under §

16.1-269.1

shall not be admissible against him over objection in any criminal proceedings following the transfer, except for purposes of impeachment.

Prior to a transfer hearing pursuant to subsection A of §

16.1-269.1

or a preliminary hearing pursuant to subsection C of §

16.1-269.1

, a study and report to the court, in writing, relevant to the factors set out in subdivision A 4 of § 16.1-269.1, as well as an assessment of any affiliation with a criminal street gang as defined in §

18.2-46.1

, shall be made by the probation services or other qualified agency designated by the court. Upon motion of the attorney for the Commonwealth for a transfer hearing pursuant to subsection A of § 16.1-269.1, the attorney for the Commonwealth shall provide notice to the designated probation services or other qualified agency of the need for a transfer report. Counsel for the juvenile and the attorney for the Commonwealth shall have full access to the study and report and any other report or data concerning the juvenile which are available to the court. The court shall not consider the report until a finding has been made concerning probable cause. If the court so orders, the study and report may be expanded to include matters provided for in §

16.1-273

, whereupon it may also serve as the report required by this subsection, but on the condition that it will not be submitted to the judge who will preside at any subsequent hearings except as provided for by law.

After the completion of the hearing, whether or not the juvenile court decides to retain jurisdiction over the juvenile or transfer such juvenile for criminal proceedings in the circuit court, the juvenile court shall set bail for the juvenile in accordance with Chapter 9 (§

19.2-119

et seq.) of Title 19.2, if bail has not already been set.

History.

1994, cc. 859, 949; 1999, c. 350; 2005, cc. 590, 843; 2020, cc. 987, 988.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 1, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 3, provides that the contingent enactment of this section by Acts 1994, cc. 859 and 949, cl. 2, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “only if state funds are provided by the General Assembly sufficient to provide adequate resources for the court to carry out the purposes of this act and to fulfill its mission to serve children and families of the Commonwealth.” The funding was not provided.

The 1999 amendment

inserted “as well as an assessment of any affiliation with a youth gang as defined in §

16.1-299.2

” in the first sentence of subsection B.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 590 added the second sentence in subsection B.

The 2005 amendment by c. 843, in subsection B, substituted “criminal street” for “youth” and “18.2-46.1” for “16.1-299.2.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 987 and 988 are identical, and inserted “or a preliminary hearing pursuant to subsection C of §

16.1-269.1

” in subsection B in the first sentence.

§ 16.1-269.3.
Retention by juvenile court; appeal.

If a case is not transferred following a transfer hearing or is not certified following a probable cause hearing, the judge who conducted the hearing shall not, over the objection of any interested party, preside at the adjudicatory hearing on the petition, but rather it shall be presided over by another judge of that court. If the attorney for the Commonwealth deems it to be in the public interest, and the juvenile is fourteen years of age or older he may, within ten days after the juvenile court’s final decision to retain the case in accordance with subsection A of §

16.1-269.1

, file a notice of appeal of the decision to the appropriate circuit court. A copy of such notice shall be furnished at the same time to the counsel for the juvenile.

History.

1994, cc. 859, 949; 1996, cc. 755, 914.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 1, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 3, provides that the contingent enactment of this section by Acts 1994, cc. 859 and 949, cl. 2, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “only if state funds are provided by the General Assembly sufficient to provide adequate resources for the court to carry out the purposes of this act and to fulfill its mission to serve children and families of the Commonwealth.” The funding was not provided.

The 1996 amendments.

The 1996 amendments by cc. 755 and 914 are identical, and, in the first sentence, substituted “a case” for “the case” and inserted “following a transfer hearing or is not certified following a probable cause hearing” following “not transferred,” and in the second sentence, deleted “and is charged with an offense which, if committed by an adult, would be punishable by death or confinement in a state correctional facility for life or a maximum period of twenty years or more,” following “and the juvenile is fourteen years of age or older” and inserted “in accordance with subsection A of §

16.1-269.1

” following “court’s final decision to retain the case.”

§ 16.1-269.4.
Transfer to circuit court; appeal by juvenile.

If the juvenile court transfers the case pursuant to subsection A of §

16.1-269.1

, the juvenile may, within ten days after the juvenile court’s final decision, file a notice of appeal of the decision to the appropriate circuit court. A copy of the notice shall be furnished at the same time to the attorney for the Commonwealth.

History.

1994, cc. 859, 949; 1996, cc. 755, 914.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 1, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 3, provides that the contingent enactment of this section by Acts 1994, cc. 859 and 949, cl. 2, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “only if state funds are provided by the General Assembly sufficient to provide adequate resources for the court to carry out the purposes of this act and to fulfill its mission to serve children and families of the Commonwealth.” The funding was not provided.

The 1996 amendments.

The 1996 amendments by cc. 755 and 914 are identical, and inserted “pursuant to subsection A of §

16.1-269.1

” following “court transfers the case.”

§ 16.1-269.5.
Placement of juvenile.

The juvenile court may order placement of the transferred juvenile in either a local correctional facility as approved by the State Board of Local and Regional Jails pursuant to the limitations of subsections D and E of §

16.1-249

or a juvenile detention facility.

History.

1994, cc. 859, 949; 1995, cc. 746, 798, 802; 2010, c. 739; 2020, c. 759.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 1, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 3, provides that the contingent enactment of this section by Acts 1994, cc. 859 and 949, cl. 2, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “only if state funds are provided by the General Assembly sufficient to provide adequate resources for the court to carry out the purposes of this act and to fulfill its mission to serve children and families of the Commonwealth.” The funding was not provided.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 739 substituted “subsections D and E” for “subsection E.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 759 substituted “State Board of Local and Regional Jails” for “State Board of Corrections.”

§ 16.1-269.6.
Circuit court hearing; jury; termination of juvenile court jurisdiction; objections and appeals.

Within seven days after receipt of notice of an appeal from the transfer decision pursuant to subsection A of §

16.1-269.1

, by either the attorney for the Commonwealth or the juvenile, or if an appeal to such a decision to transfer is not noted, upon expiration of the time in which to note such an appeal, the clerk of the court shall forward to the circuit court all papers connected with the case, including any report required by subsection B of §

16.1-269.2

, as well as a written court order setting forth the reasons for the juvenile court’s decision. Within seven days after receipt of notice of an appeal, the clerk shall forward copies of the order to the attorney for the Commonwealth and other counsel of record.

The circuit court, when practicable, shall, within 45 days after receipt of the case from the juvenile court pursuant to subsection A of §

16.1-269.1

, (i) if either the juvenile or the attorney for the Commonwealth has appealed the transfer decision, examine all such papers, reports and orders and conduct a hearing to take further evidence on the issue of transfer, to determine if there has been substantial compliance with subsection A of §

16.1-269.1

, but without redetermining whether the juvenile court had sufficient evidence to find probable cause; and (ii) enter an order either remanding the case to the juvenile court or advising the attorney for the Commonwealth that he may seek an indictment. A juvenile held continuously in secure detention shall be released from confinement if there is no hearing on the merits of his case within 45 days of the filing of the appeal. The circuit court may extend the time limitations for a reasonable period of time based upon good cause shown, provided the basis for such extension is recorded in writing and filed among the papers of the proceedings. However, in cases where a charge has been certified by the juvenile court to the grand jury pursuant to subsection B or C of § 16.1-269.1, the attorney for the Commonwealth may seek an indictment upon such charge and any ancillary charge without obtaining an order of the circuit court advising him that he may do so.

The circuit court order advising the attorney for the Commonwealth that he may seek an indictment shall divest the juvenile court of its jurisdiction over the case as well as the juvenile court’s jurisdiction over any other allegations of delinquency arising from the same act, transaction or scheme giving rise to the charge for which the juvenile has been transferred. In addition, upon conviction of the juvenile following transfer or certification and trial as an adult, the circuit court shall issue an order terminating the juvenile court’s jurisdiction over that juvenile with respect to any future criminal acts alleged to have been committed by such juvenile and with respect to any pending allegations of delinquency which have not been disposed of by the juvenile court at the time of the criminal conviction. However, such an order terminating the juvenile court’s jurisdiction shall not apply to any allegations of criminal conduct that would properly be within the jurisdiction of the juvenile and domestic relations district court if the defendant were an adult. Upon receipt of the order terminating the juvenile court’s jurisdiction over the juvenile, the clerk of the juvenile court shall forward any pending petitions of delinquency for proceedings in the appropriate general district court.

The judge of the circuit court who reviewed the case after receipt from the juvenile court shall not, over the objection of any interested party, preside over the trial of such charge or charges.

Any objection to the jurisdiction of the circuit court pursuant to this article shall be waived if not made before arraignment.

The time period beginning with the filing of a notice of appeal pursuant to §

16.1-269.3

or §

16.1-269.4

and ending with the order of the circuit court disposing of the appeal shall not be included as applying to the provisions of §

19.2-243

.

History.

1994, cc. 859, 949; 1996, cc. 755, 914; 1997, c. 862; 2003, c. 144; 2004, c. 468; 2010, c. 739.

Cross references.

As to the one year deadline for claims of error or defect, see §

16.1-272.1

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 1 and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 3, provides that the contingent enactment of this section by Acts 1994, cc. 859 and 949, cl. 2, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “only if state funds are provided by the General Assembly sufficient to provide adequate resources for the court to carry out the purposes of this act and to fulfill its mission to serve children and families of the Commonwealth.” The funding was not provided.

The 1996 amendments.

The 1996 amendment by c. 755 inserted “pursuant to subsection A of §

16.1-269.1

”’ in two places, and, in subsection B, redesignated former clauses (ii) and (iii) as present clauses (i) and (ii), deleted former clause (i) which read: “examine all such papers, reports and orders,” inserted “examine all such papers, reports and orders and” following “transfer decision,” inserted “subsection A of” following “has been substantial compliance with,” and added the last sentence.

The 1996 amendment by c. 914 inserted “pursuant to subsection A of §

16.1-269.1

” in two places, in subsection B, redesignated former clauses (ii) and (iii) as present clauses (i) and (ii), deleted former clause (i) which read: “examine all such papers, reports and orders,” inserted “examine all such papers, reports and orders and” following “transfer decision,” inserted “subsection A of” following “has been substantial compliance with,” added the last sentence, and inserted “or certification” following “transfer” in the second sentence of subsection C.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 144 inserted the next-to-last sentence in subsection C.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 468 added “Within seven days after receipt of notice of an appeal” at the beginning of the last sentence in subsection A; and in subsection B, in the first sentence, inserted “when practicable” and substituted “45 days” for “a reasonable time” near the beginning and inserted the present second and third sentences.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 739 deleted the former fourth sentence of subsection B, which read: “Upon advising the attorney for the Commonwealth that he may seek an indictment, the circuit court may issue an order transferring the juvenile from the juvenile detention facility to an appropriate local correctional facility where the juvenile need no longer be entirely separate and removed from adults, unless, upon motion of counsel, good cause is shown for placement of the juvenile pursuant to the limitations of subdivision E (i), (ii), and (iii) of §

16.1-249

.”

Law Review.

For 2003/2004 survey of family and juvenile law, see 39 U. Rich. L. Rev. 241 (2004).

For survey of Virginia criminal law and procedure for the year 2004-2005, see 40 U. Rich. L. Rev. 197 (2005).

For note, “Let the Jury Do the Waive: How Apprendi v. New Jersey Applies to Juvenile Transfer Proceedings,” see 48 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 723 (2006).

§ 16.1-270.
Waiver of jurisdiction of juvenile court in certain cases.

At any time prior to commencement of the adjudicatory hearing, a juvenile fourteen years of age or older charged with an offense which if committed by an adult could be punishable by confinement in a state correctional facility, with the written consent of his counsel, may elect in writing to waive the jurisdiction of the juvenile court and have his case transferred to the appropriate circuit court, in which event his case shall thereafter be dealt with in the same manner as if he had been transferred pursuant to this article.

History.

Code 1950, § 16.1-176.2; 1973, c. 440; 1977, c. 559; 1994, cc. 859, 949.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 2, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 4, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “if state funds are provided, including all local costs, to carry out the purposes of this bill by the General Assembly.” The funding was not provided.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

9B M.J. Infants & Juveniles, § 13.

§ 16.1-271.
Subsequent offenses by juvenile.

Conviction of a juvenile as an adult pursuant to the provisions of this chapter shall preclude the juvenile court from taking jurisdiction of such juvenile for subsequent offenses committed by that juvenile.

Any juvenile who is tried and convicted in a circuit court as an adult under the provisions of this article shall be considered and treated as an adult in any criminal proceeding resulting from any alleged future criminal acts and any pending allegations of delinquency which have not been disposed of by the juvenile court at the time of the criminal conviction.

All procedures and dispositions applicable to adults charged with such a criminal offense shall apply in such cases, including, but not limited to, arrest; probable cause determination by a magistrate or grand jury; the use of a warrant, summons, or capias instead of a petition to initiate the case; adult bail; preliminary hearing and right to counsel provisions; trial in a court having jurisdiction over adults; and trial and sentencing as an adult. The provisions of this article regarding a transfer hearing shall not be applicable to such juveniles.

History.

1977, c. 559; 1989, c. 675; 1990, c. 668; 1994, cc. 859, 949; 2007, c. 221.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 2, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 4, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “if state funds are provided, including all local costs, to carry out the purposes of this bill by the General Assembly.” The funding was not provided.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “from taking” has been substituted for “for taking” in the first sentence to correct an error in the 2007 act.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 221 substituted “Conviction of a juvenile” for “The trial or treatment of a juvenile” at the beginning of the first paragraph.

Law Review.

For survey on legal issues involving children in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 705 (1989).

For an article, “Criminal Law and Procedure,” see 31 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1015 (1997).

For 2000 survey of Virginia law regarding children, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 939 (2000).

For 2003/2004 survey of criminal law and procedure, see 39 U. Rich. L. Rev. 133 (2004).

For 2003/2004 survey of family and juvenile law, see 39 U. Rich. L. Rev. 241 (2004).

For 2007 annual survey article, “Criminal Law and Procedure,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 311 (2007).

For annual survey article, “Criminal Law and Procedure,” see 46 U. Rich. L. Rev. 59 (2011).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

9B M.J. Infants and Juveniles, § 84; 17 M.J. Statutes, § 47.